Louisiana, session 2026, HB319.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:972(A)(11) through (22) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 24:972(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§972. Membership; meetings; compensation; staff
A. The commission shall consist of the following members:
* * *
(11) One state coordinator of the Louisiana Legislators Back to School
Program, to represent the Senate program, appointed jointly by the president of the
Senate.
(12) One state coordinator of the Louisiana Legislators Back to School
Program, to represent the House of Representatives program, appointed by and the
speaker of the House of Representatives.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 319 ENROLLED
(13) (12) The state coordinator of Project Citizen, or his designee.
(14) (13) The executive director of the Public Affairs Research Council, or
his designee.
(15) (14) The executive director of the Council Leaders for a Better
Louisiana, or his designee.
(16) (15) One member to represent Louisiana Public Broadcasting, appointed
by the executive director of the Louisiana Public Broadcasting Corporation.
(17) (16) One member to represent the League of Women Voters, appointed
by the League of Women Voters of Louisiana.
(18) (17) One member to represent the Louisiana Press Association and one
member to represent the Louisiana Association of Broadcasters, appointed by the
president of each association.
(19) (18) One member to represent the Louisiana Center for Law and Civic
Education, appointed by the president of its board of directors.
(20) One member to represent the Louisiana Association of Non-Profit
Organizations, appointed by the chairman of the Louisiana Association of Non-Profit
Organizations.
(21) (19) One member to represent the Louisiana Chapter of the National
Association for the Advancement of Colored People, appointed by the president of
the Louisiana Chapter of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored
People.
(22) (20) The chairman of the Volunteer Louisiana Commission, or his
designee.
(23) Any additional member who has expertise in civic education or civic
involvement, as may be designated by three-fourths of the commission members
present and voting. Such member shall serve at the pleasure of the commission.
(24) (21) One member to represent the Louisiana District Judges
Association, appointed by the president of its board of directors.
(25) (22) The chief justice of the Louisiana Supreme Court or his designee.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 319 ENROLLED
F. Ten members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business, and all official action of the commission shall require the
favorable vote of a majority of those members present and voting.
Section 2. 24:972(A)(23) through (25) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.